Utah statutes.
53-6-310.   Responsibility for training -- Certification.

(1)  The division is not responsible for providing basic or in-service training for certified dispatchers except for approval of the instructors and content of training where required by this chapter or division rules.

(2)  Where this chapter requires an agency head to certify that a member has completed required training, the division shall rely on the certification, as provided, to be accurate.

